Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
COMPTROLLER; POWERS AND DUTIES

§40-1 Comptroller to supervise accounts,
etc. (a) The comptroller shall be the general accountant of the State and
shall cause to be recorded every receipt and disbursement of money made to, by,
or through the treasury. The comptroller shall have the power to withhold any
disbursement for which no appropriation has been made or which would cause a
specific appropriation to be exceeded.

(b) With respect to the executive branch,
except the University of Hawaii until June 30, 2016, and the department of
education, the comptroller shall have complete supervision of all accounts.
The comptroller shall preaudit all proposed payments of $10,000 or more to
determine the propriety of expenditures and compliance with executive orders
and rules that may be in effect. When necessary, the comptroller shall
withhold approval of any payment. Whenever approval is withheld, the
department or agency concerned shall be promptly notified. With respect to the
University of Hawaii and the department of education, the comptroller shall
issue warrants for the release of funds for the operating costs of the
university or the department of education, as applicable, in amounts and at
times mutually agreed upon by the governor or director of finance and the
university or department of education, as applicable; provided that:

(1) The amounts released shall not exceed the
allotment ceilings for the respective funding sources of the university's or
the department of education's appropriations established by the governor for an
allotment period pursuant to section 37-34; and

(2) The comptroller may issue warrants as an advance
from the state treasury to the University of Hawaii and the department of
education to establish a checking account and provide working capital in
amounts and at times mutually agreed upon by the governor or director of
finance and the University of Hawaii and the department of education.

The University of Hawaii and the department of
education shall preaudit all proposed payments of $10,000 or more and shall
preaudit samples of the population of proposed payments of less than $10,000;
provided that the sample size comprises at least five per cent of the
population, and is of a size that the chief financial officers of the
University of Hawaii and the department of education, as applicable, determine
appropriate, to determine the propriety of expenditures and compliance with
applicable laws, executive orders, and rules. The University of Hawaii and the
department of education shall make disbursements for operating expenses from
the amounts released by the comptroller and maintain records and documents
necessary to support those disbursements at times mutually agreed upon by the
university president or the superintendent of education, as applicable, and the
comptroller; provided that when requested by the university or department of
education, the comptroller shall make all disbursements for the university or
department of education, as applicable, subject to available allotment. Funds
released pursuant to this section shall be deposited by the university or
department of education, as applicable, in accordance with the provisions
applicable to the director of finance by chapter 38. Any interest earned on
the deposit of funds released pursuant to this section shall be deposited in
the state treasury at the end of each fiscal year.

(c) With respect to the judiciary and the
legislature, the comptroller shall make available to the judiciary and the
legislature the total amount appropriated to each, except that the judiciary
and the legislature may request the comptroller's services in maintaining
custody of the amount appropriated to each and in making payments therefrom.
When such services are requested, the comptroller shall make all disbursements
requested by the judiciary or the legislature, but shall not make any
disbursement for which no appropriation has been made or which would cause a
specific appropriation to be exceeded.

(d) Any financial transaction recorded may be
inspected by the public. [L 1898, c 39, §9; RL 1925, §1435; RL 1935, §562; RL
1945, §1564; RL 1955, §34-13; am L 1957, c 152, §1; HRS §40-1; am L 1974, c
159, §4; am L 1986, c 321, §§4, 12; am L 1987, c 283, §69; am L 1989, c 371,
§§4, 7; am L 1990, c 66, §1; am L 1991, c 163, §3; am L 1993, c 314, §§1, 2; am
L Sp 1993, c 8, §22; am L 1996, c 231, §1; am L 1997, c 180, §1; am L 1998, c
115, §24; am L 2004, c 58, §§3, 14; am L 2005, c 22, §50 and c 137, §1; am L
2006, c 161, §§1, 7 and c 306, §1; am L 2008, c 37, §1; am L Sp 2009, c 5, §12;
am L 2010, c 102, §5, c 124, §6 as superseded by c 124, §10, and c 161, §3 as
superseded by c 161, §5; am L 2015, c 44, §§1, 7 to 9]

Note

In the first sentence of subsection (b), the brackets around
the comma after "June 30, 2016" omitted to correct printing error in the
2015 Supplement.

Cross References

Generally, see §26-6.

Services to judiciary and legislature, see §26-25.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next